idioms/varieties.xfst
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
################################################################################
# University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
# Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Different Standards and Typos
# Author: Reto Baumgartner
# Date: June 2013
################################################################################

################################################################################
# Alphabets
################################################################################

define LowerCon [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z];
define LowerVoc [a|e|i|o|u];
define LowerAcc [á|é|í|ó|ú];
define LowerUml [ö|ü];
define UpperCon [B|C|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z];
define UpperVoc [A|E|I|O|U];
define UpperAcc [Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú];
define UpperUml [Ö|Ü];

define Lower [LowerCon|LowerVoc|LowerAcc|LowerUml];
define Upper [UpperCon|UpperVoc|UpperAcc|UpperUml];
define Char [Lower|Upper];

# Diacritic accents may vary between the standards, so they can be deleted.
define Deaccentize [à (->) a, è (->) e, ì (->) i, ò (->) o, ù (->) u];

################################################################################
# Idiom Simulation: Ladin (Puter and Vallader)
################################################################################

# Ladin Consonant changes:
define LadC1 [{stg} (->) "<VCHG>" {s-ch} "<VARI>"];
define LadC2 [{tg}  (->) "<VCHG>" {ch} "<VARI>"];
define LadC3 [{gn}  (->) "<VCHG>" {n} "<VARI>"];
define LadC [LadC1 .o. LadC2 .o. LadC3];

# Ladin vowel changes:
define LadV1 [{a}  (->) "<VCHG>" {o} "<VARI>" ,
              {au} (->) "<VCHG>" {o} "<VARI>"];
define LadV2 [{e}  (->) "<VCHG>" {a} "<VARI>" ,
              {e}  (->) "<VCHG>" {ai} "<VARI>" ,
              {e}  (->) "<VCHG>" {ei} "<VARI>" ,
              {e}  (->) "<VCHG>" {i} "<VARI>" ,
              {e}  (->) "<VCHG>" {ö} "<VARI>"];
define LadV3 [{i}  (->) "<VCHG>" {ü} "<VARI>" , 
              {ie} (->) "<VCHG>" {ö} "<VARI>"];
define LadV4 [{o}  (->) "<VCHG>" {ou} "<VARI>" ,
              {o}  (->) "<VCHG>" {u} "<VARI>"];
define LadV5 [{u}  (->) "<VCHG>" {uo} "<VARI>"];
define LadV [LadV1 .o. LadV2 .o. LadV3 .o. LadV4 .o. LadV5];

# Ladin accent rules:
define LadAccent [
	{a} (->) {à} "<ACC>",
	{e} (->) {è} "<ACC>",
	{e} (->) {ê} "<ACC>",
	{i} (->) {ï} "<ACC>",
	{o} (->) {ò} "<ACC>",
	{o} (->) {ô} "<ACC>"];

# Ladin grammar rules:
define LadAdv [{main} (->) {maing} || _ .#.];

# Puter vowel changes:
define PutrV1 [{a} (->) "<VCHG>" {au} "<VARI>" || _ n];
define PutrV2 [{a} (->) "<VCHG>" {e} "<VARI>"];
define PutrV [PutrV1 .o. PutrV2];

# Puter consonant changes:
define PutrC1 [{c} (->) "<VCHG>" {ch} "<VARI>" || _ .#.];
define PutrC [PutrC1];

# Vallader consonant changes:
define VallC1 [{gi} (->) "<VCHG>" {j} "<VARI>" || _ a];
define VallC [VallC1]; 

# Collection:
define PutrChanges [LadC .o. LadV .o. PutrC .o. PutrV .o. LadAccent .o. LadAdv];
define VallChanges [LadC .o. LadV .o. VallC .o. LadAccent .o. LadAdv];

################################################################################
# Idiom Simulation: Surmiran
################################################################################

# Surmiran consonant changes:
define SurmC1 [{ch} (->) "<VCHG>" {tg} "<VARI>"];
define SurmC2 [{l}  (->) "<VCHG>" {gl} "<VARI>" || _ .#.];
define SurmC3 [{ch} (->) "<VCHG>" {c} "<VARI>" || _ a];
define SurmC4 [{v}  (->) "<VCHG>" {g} "<VARI>" || .#. _];
define SurmC5 [{h}  (->) "<VCHG>" "<VARI>" || .#. _];
define SurmC [SurmC1 .o. SurmC2 .o. SurmC3 .o. SurmC4 .o. SurmC5];

# Surmiran vowel changes:
define SurmV1 [{a} (->) "<VCHG>" {o} "<VARI>"];
define SurmV2 [{e} (->) "<VCHG>" {a} "<VARI>" ,
               {e} (->) "<VCHG>" {i} "<VARI>" ,
               {e} (->) "<VCHG>" {i} "<VARI>"];
define SurmV3 [{i} (->) "<VCHG>" {e} "<VARI>"];
define SurmV4 [{o} (->) "<VCHG>" {a} "<VARI>"];
define SurmV5 [{u} (->) "<VCHG>" {o} "<VARI>"];
define SurmV [SurmV1 .o. SurmV2 .o. SurmV3 .o. SurmV4 .o. SurmV5];

# Surmiran accent rules:
define SurmAccent [
	{e} (->) {è} "<ACC>",
	{i} (->) {î} "<ACC>",
	{o} (->) {ò} "<ACC>",
	{o} (->) {ô} "<ACC>"];

# Collection
define SurmChanges [SurmC.o. SurmV .o. SurmAccent];

################################################################################
# Idiom Simulation: Sursilvan
################################################################################


# Sursilvan consonant changes:
define SursC1 [{ch} (->) "<VCHG>" {tg} "<VARI>"];
define SursC2 [{gn} (->) "<VCHG>" {n} "<VARI>"];
define SursC3 [{ch} (->) "<VCHG>" {c} "<VARI>" || _ a];
define SursC4 [{v}  (->) "<VCHG>" "<VARI>" || .#. _ u];
define SursC [SursC1 .o. SursC2 .o. SursC3 .o. SursC4];

# Sursilvan vowel changes:
define SursV1 [{a} (->) "<VCHG>" {au} "<VARI>"];
define SursV2 [{e} (->) "<VCHG>" {ia} "<VARI>" ,
               {e} (->) "<VCHG>" {i} "<VARI>" ,
               {e} (->) "<VCHG>" {ei} "<VARI>"];
define SursV3 [{i} (->) "<VCHG>" {e} "<VARI>"];
define SursV5 [{u} (->) "<VCHG>" {uo} "<VARI>"];
define SursV [SursV1 .o. SursV2 .o. SursV3 .o. SursV5];

# Sursilvan accent rules:
define SursAccent [
	{a} (->) {à} "<ACC>",
	{e} (->) {è} "<ACC>",
	{e} (->) {é} "<ACC>",
	{i} (->) {î} "<ACC>",
	{o} (->) {ó} "<ACC>"];

# Collection
define SursChanges [SursC.o. SursV .o. SursAccent];

################################################################################
# Idiom Simulation: Sutsilvan
################################################################################

# Sutsilvan consonant changes:
define SutsC1 [{ch} (->) "<VCHG>" {tg} "<VARI>"];
define SutsC2 [{n}  (->) "<VCHG>" {gn} "<VARI>" , 
               {gn} (->) "<VCHG>" {n} "<VARI>"];
define SutsC3 [{ch} (->) "<VCHG>" {c} "<VARI>" || _ a];
define SutsC4 [{v}  (->) "<VCHG>" {g} "<VARI>" || .#. _];
define SutsC5 [{h}  (->) "<VCHG>" "<VARI>"  || .#. _];
define SutsC [SutsC1 .o. SutsC2 .o. SutsC3 .o. SutsC4 .o. SutsC5];

# Sutsilvan vowel changes:
define SutsV1 [{a} (->) "<VCHG>" {o} "<VARI>" ];
define SutsV2 [{e} (->) "<VCHG>" {a} "<VARI>" , 
               {e} (->) "<VCHG>" {ea} "<VARI>" ];
define SutsV3 [{i} (->) "<VCHG>" {e} "<VARI>" ,
               {i} (->) "<VCHG>" {ei} "<VARI>" ];
define SutsV4 [{o} (->) "<VCHG>" {u} "<VARI>" ];
define SutsV5 [{u} (->) "<VCHG>" {ua}"<VARI>" ];
define SutsV [SutsV1 .o. SutsV2 .o. SutsV3 .o. SutsV4 .o. SutsV5];

# Sutsilvan accent rules:
define SutsAccent [
	{a} (->) {â} "<ACC>",
	{e} (->) {à} "<ACC>",
	{e} (->) {é} "<ACC>",
	{e} (->) {è} "<ACC>",
	{o} (->) {ò} "<ACC>",
	{u} (->) {ù} "<ACC>"];

# Collection
define SutsChanges [SutsC.o. SutsV .o. SutsAccent];

################################################################################
# Restriction Rules
################################################################################
# At least one change must have happened:
define MinOneChange [$["<VARI>"]];

# Only one newly insertec diacritic accent (grave, circumflex, acute) in one
# word is permitted.
define MaxOneAccent $?["<ACC>"];

# All restrictions:
define Restrictions [ MinOneChange .o. MaxOneAccent ];

################################################################################
# Cleanup
################################################################################

# Cleanup:
define Clean1 [ "<VCHG>" -> 0 ];
define Clean2 [ "<VARI>" -> 0 ];
define Clean3 [ "<ACC>" -> 0 ];
define CleanCHG [ Clean1 .o. Clean2 .o. Clean3 ];

################################################################################
# Collection of all Changes per Variety
################################################################################

define PuterChanges     [ Deaccentize .o. PutrChanges .o. Restrictions .o. CleanCHG ];
define SurmiranChanges  [ Deaccentize .o. SurmChanges .o. Restrictions .o. CleanCHG ];
define SursilvanChanges [ Deaccentize .o. SursChanges .o. Restrictions .o. CleanCHG ];
define SutsilvanChanges [ Deaccentize .o. SutsChanges .o. Restrictions .o. CleanCHG ];
define ValladerChanges  [ Deaccentize .o. VallChanges .o. Restrictions .o. CleanCHG ];

################################################################################
# Loading Networks
################################################################################

read regex PuterChanges;
save stack fstbinaries/PuterChanges.fst;
clear stack

read regex SurmiranChanges;
save stack fstbinaries/SurmiranChanges.fst;
clear stack

read regex SursilvanChanges;
save stack fstbinaries/SursilvanChanges.fst;
clear stack

read regex SutsilvanChanges;
save stack fstbinaries/SutsilvanChanges.fst;
clear stack

read regex ValladerChanges;
save stack fstbinaries/ValladerChanges.fst;
